Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.050

Certification without examination.

The secretary may certify a person applying for the title "certified dietitian" without examination if such person is licensed or certified as a dietitian in another jurisdiction and if, in the secretary's judgment, the requirements of that jurisdiction are equivalent to or greater than those of Washington state.

[ 1991 c 3 s 282; 1988 c 277 s 6.]